Utah statutes.
36-17-2.   Committee duties.

The committee shall:

(1)  review existing legislative and budget procedures and study the legislative and budget procedures used in other states;

(2)  review and consider alternatives to the Utah Legislature's current process for preparing a budget;

(3)  review and consider alternatives to the Utah Legislature's current process for requesting, preparing, prefiling, and prioritizing legislation;

(4)  review and consider alternatives to the Utah Legislature's current process for interims;

(5)  review and consider alternatives to the current role of standing committees in the legislative process;

(6)  review and consider alternatives to the Utah Legislature's rules governing floor actions;

(7)  review and consider alternative measures to meet the constitutional requirements for Utah's legislative process;

(8)  review and consider any other matters involving the legislative process; and

(9)  make recommendations, if any, to the Legislative Management Committee for any changes to the legislative process.



Enacted by Chapter 164, 1991 General Session

